California statutes. Education Code
(a) “Administrative employee” means an employee of a school district, employed in a position requiring certification qualifications, who does not come within the definition of a “pupil services employee” or a “teacher.”

(b) “Classified employee” means an employee of a school district, employed in a position not requiring certification qualifications.

(c) “Pupil services employee” means an employee of a school district, employed in a position requiring a standard designated services credential, health and
 development credential, or a librarian credential, who performs direct services to pupils. “Pupil services employee” includes, but is not limited to, in-school librarians, school nurses, assistant in-school librarians, audiovisual personnel, counselors, psychologists, psychometrists, guidance and welfare personnel, attendance personnel, school social workers, and all other certificated personnel performing pupil-personnel, health, or librarian services.

(d) (1) “Teacher” means an employee of a school district, employed in a position requiring certification qualifications, whose duties require the employee to provide direct instruction to pupils in the schools of that district for the full time for which the employee is employed.
 “Teacher” includes, but is not limited to, teachers of special classes, teachers of exceptional children, teachers of pupils with physical disabilities, teachers of minors with intellectual disabilities, substitute teachers, instructional television teachers, specialist mathematics teachers, specialist reading teachers, home and hospital teachers, and learning disability group teachers. Instructional preparation time shall be counted as part of the teacher full-time equivalent, including, but not limited to, mentor teacher or department chairperson time.

(2) The Los Angeles Unified School District may also
 include in the definition of “teacher” any of the following when calculating the ratio of administrative employees to teachers calculated pursuant to this article in the 2022–23 to 2024–25 fiscal years, inclusive:

(A) Teachers who spend a majority of their time with pupils as intervention specialists.

(B) Teachers who spend a majority of their time on a school campus providing training, coaching, or professional development to other teachers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 908, Sec. 1.   (AB 2038)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

41402.

The maximum ratios of administrative employees to each 100 teachers in the various types of school districts shall be as follows:

(a) In elementary school districts—9.

(b) In unified school districts—8.

(c) In high school districts—7.

This section shall not apply to a school district that has one or fewer
 administrators.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 677, Sec. 13.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

41403.

(a) The Superintendent shall determine, for each current fiscal year, for each school district in the state, to two decimal points, the following:

(1) The total number of administrative employees, except those serving in positions that are supported by categorical grants from any source and are in programs that require specific teacher/administrator ratios, or that are supported by federal funds. As to those serving in positions that are not supported completely by these categorical grants from any source or completely by federal funds, the number of administrative employees reported shall include the full-time equivalent of all fractional time attributable
 to that time not supported by categorical grants or federal funds.

(2) The total number of teachers, except those serving in positions that are supported by federal funds or by categorical grants from any source and are in programs that require specific teacher/administrator ratios. As to those serving in positions that are not supported completely by these categorical grants from any source or completely by federal funds, the number of teachers reported shall include the full-time equivalent of all fractional time attributable to that time not supported by categorical grants or federal funds. Substitute teachers may be counted as teachers only if the teacher for whom they are substituting is not counted. In no event shall the number of full-time equivalent teachers reported be greater than the number of full-time equivalent teaching
 positions in the school district.

(3) The total maximum number of administrative employees that should be employed by the school district based upon the application of the appropriate ratio prescribed by Section 41402 to the number of teachers determined pursuant to paragraph (2).

(4) The number of administrative employees in excess of the number allowable without penalty as determined by subtracting the number determined pursuant to paragraph (3) from the number determined pursuant to paragraph (1).

(b) The number of employees reported pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a) shall include the full-time equivalent of all fractional time of those employees.

(c) For purposes of determining the allowable ratio of administrative employees to teachers for the Los Angeles Unified School District and the San Diego City School District, the number of employees and the full-time equivalent of all of the fractional time of employees serving the school district in positions mandated as the result of the school district’s court-ordered integration plan is excluded from the numbers identified pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a).

(d) No individual may be counted as more than one full-time
 equivalent employee unless the individual is employed on a part-time basis in adult education, driver education, or vocational education, or any part-time or additional teaching assignment, in addition to the individual’s regular full-time assignment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 908, Sec. 2.   (AB 2038)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

41404.

(a) The Superintendent shall determine the reduction in state support resulting from excess administrative employees identified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 41403 as follows:

(1) Compute the ratio that total state support to the school district general fund bears to the total general fund income of the school district.

(2) Multiply the ratio determined pursuant to paragraph (1) by the average salary of administrative employees.

(3) Multiply the product of paragraph (2) by the number of administrative
 employees converted to the nearest whole number in excess of the maximum number specified in Section 41402.

(b) The amount of the second principal apportionment made to the school district for the current fiscal year pursuant to Section 41335 shall be reduced by the product so produced. However, no reduction shall reduce the final apportionment below the amount specified in Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 908, Sec. 3.   (AB 2038)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

41404.5.

(a) A school district with an average daily attendance of more than 400,000 as of the 2016–17 second principal apportionment shall be exempt from any reduction in state support pursuant to Section 41404 for the 2019–20 fiscal year to the 2021–22 fiscal year, inclusive. A school district subject to this exemption shall submit the following to the Superintendent, the Department of Finance, and the budget committees of both houses of the Legislature:

(1) By September 1, 2019, a report containing the administrator-to-teacher ratio calculated pursuant to this article for the 2011–12 fiscal year to the 2019–20 fiscal year, inclusive, a description of the reasons for not meeting the ratio requirement for each fiscal year in which the ratio was not met, including the
 estimated impact on pupils, and a plan setting out goals for meeting the ratio by the 2023–24 fiscal year.

(2) By each September 1 from 2020 to 2022, inclusive, a report detailing the administrator-to-teacher ratio calculated pursuant to this article for the prior fiscal year and the progress towards meeting the goals set out in the report provided pursuant to paragraph (1).

(b) The Los Angeles Unified School District shall submit the following to the Superintendent, the Department of Finance, and the budget committees of both houses of the Legislature:

(1) By September 1, 2023, a report containing the ratio of
 administrative employees to teachers calculated pursuant to this article for the 2011–12 fiscal year to the 2022–23 fiscal year, inclusive, a description of the reasons for not meeting the ratio requirement for each fiscal year in which the ratio was not met, including the estimated impact on pupils and the number of teachers and administrators above the required ratio, and a plan setting out goals for meeting the ratio by the 2025–26 fiscal year.

(2) By each September 1 from 2024 to 2025, inclusive, a report detailing the ratio of administrative employees to teachers calculated pursuant to this article, including the number of teachers and administrators above the required ratio, for the prior fiscal year and the progress towards meeting the goals set out in the report provided pursuant to paragraph (1).

(c) (1) The Paradise Unified School District shall be
 exempt from any reduction in state support pursuant to Section 41404 for the 2021–22 fiscal year to the 2023–24 fiscal year, inclusive.

(2) (A) The Paradise Unified School District shall be exempt from any reduction in state support pursuant to Section 41404 for the 2024–25 fiscal year to the 2026–27 fiscal year, inclusive. The Paradise Unified School District shall, by September 1, 2026, submit to the Superintendent, the Department of Finance, and the appropriate budget and policy committees of both houses of the Legislature, a report containing all of the following:

(i) The administrator-to-teacher ratio calculated pursuant to this article for the 2024–25 fiscal year to the 2026–27 fiscal year, inclusive, including the number of teachers and administrators above the required ratio for the prior fiscal year.

(ii) A description of the reasons for not meeting the ratio requirement for each fiscal year in which the ratio was not met, including the estimated impact on pupils.

(iii) A plan setting out goals for meeting the ratio by the 2026–27 fiscal year.

(iv) The progress towards meeting the ratio by the 2026–27 fiscal year.

(B) The report required pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(d) The Plumas Unified School District shall be exempt from any reduction in state support pursuant to Section 41404 from the 2023–24 fiscal year to the 2026–27 fiscal year,
 inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 50.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

41406.

Amounts allowable from the State School Fund but not transferred thereto because of the operation of Section 41404 and the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 14002, shall be held in the General Fund and shall be expended for public school purposes pursuant to appropriations thereof enacted by the Legislature.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41407.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a school district is subject, with regard to Section 41402, to audits conducted pursuant to Section 41020.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1168, Sec. 21.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

41409.

(a) Commencing with the 1988–89 fiscal year, and annually thereafter, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall determine the statewide average percentage of school district expenditures that are allocated to the salaries of administrative personnel, as that term is defined in accounts 1200, 1300, 1700, 1800, and 2200 in Part I of the California School Accounting Manual published by the State Department of Education. For school districts using the Standardized Account Code Structure, the term salaries of administrative personnel are
 defined in object accounts 1300 and 2300 in Part II of the California School Accounting Manual. The Superintendent of Public Instruction also shall determine the statewide average percentage of school district expenditures that are allocated to the salaries of teachers, as defined in account 1100 in Parts I and II of the California School Accounting Manual. The statewide averages shall be calculated for the following types and sizes of school districts: District ADAElementary less than 1,000Elementary 1,000 to 4,999Elementary 5,000 and greaterHigh School less than 1,000High School 1,000 to 3,999High School 4,000 and greaterUnified less than 1,500Unified 1,500 to 4,999Unified 5,000 to 9,999Unified 10,000 to 19,999Unified 20,000 and greater(b) Commencing with the 1988–89 fiscal year, and annually thereafter, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall determine the statewide average salary, by size and type of district, for the following:

(1) Beginning, mid-range, and highest salary paid to teachers.

(2) Schoolsite principals.

(3) District superintendents.

(c) The statewide averages calculated pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be provided annually to each school district for use in the school accountability report card.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 734, Sec. 20.   Effective October 11, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

41409.3.

Each school district, except for school districts maintaining a single school to serve kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, shall include in the school accountability report card required under Section 35256 a statement that shall include the following information:

(a) The beginning, median, and highest salary paid to teachers in the district, as reflected in the district’s salary scale.

(b) The average salary for
 schoolsite principals in the district.

(c) The salary of the district superintendent.

(d) Based upon the state summary information provided by the Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 41409, the statewide average salary for the appropriate size and type of district for the following:

(1) Beginning, midrange, and highest salary paid to teachers.

(2) Schoolsite principals.

(3) District superintendents.

(e) The statewide average of the percentage of school district expenditures allocated for the salaries of administrative personnel for the appropriate size and type of district for the most
 recent fiscal year, provided by the Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 41409.

(f) The percentage allocated under the district’s corresponding fiscal year expenditure for the salaries of administrative personnel, as defined in Sections 1200, 1300, 1700, 1800, and 2200 of the California School Accounting Manual published by the State Department of Education.

(g) The statewide average of the percentage of school district expenditures allocated for the salaries of teachers for the appropriate size and type of district for the most recent fiscal year, provided by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 41409.

(h) The percentage expended for the salaries of teachers, as defined in Section 1100 of the California School Accounting Manual
 published by the State Department of Education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 759, Sec. 12.   Effective September 21, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Conditions Disqualifying School Districts from Apportionments [41420. - 41455.]

41420.

(a) No school district, other than one newly formed, shall, except as otherwise provided in this article, receive any apportionment based upon average daily attendance from the State School Fund unless it has maintained the regular day schools of the district for at least 175 days during the next preceding fiscal year.

(b) If any school within a school district fails to maintain its school for the required 175 days, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall withhold from the district’s apportionment based upon average daily attendance a product of 0.01143 times the district’s apportionment for each additional day the school would have had to maintain operations to meet the 175 day requirement.

For the purpose of this subdivision, except as otherwise provided, the State Board of Education shall establish the standards and criteria for defining a day qualifying for the 175-day minimum requirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 569, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

41421.

A school district is a newly formed district up to the close of the fiscal year in which its formation became effective for all purposes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41422.

(a) A school district, county office of education, or charter school that is prevented from maintaining its schools during a fiscal year for at least 180 days for a school district or county office of education or 175 days for a charter school, or is required to operate sessions of shorter length than otherwise prescribed by law because of fire, flood, earthquake, snowstorm, or epidemic, or because of any order of any military officer of the United States or of the state to meet an emergency created by war, or of any civil officer of the United States, of the state, or of any county, city and county, or city authorized to issue that order to meet an emergency created by war, or because of other extraordinary conditions,
 or because of inability to secure or hold a teacher, or because of the illness of the teacher, which fact shall be shown to the satisfaction of the Superintendent by the affidavits of the members of the governing board of the school district, the governing board of the county office of education, or the governing board or body of the charter school and of the county superintendent of schools, shall receive the same apportionment from the State School Fund as it would have received had it not been so prevented from maintaining school for at least 180 full-length days for a school district or county office of education or 175 full-length days for a charter school.

(b) This section shall also apply to school districts, county offices of education, or charter schools that, in the absence of one or more of the conditions prescribed by this section, would have qualified for funds pursuant to Sections 46200 to 46208, inclusive, or Section 47612.5, as
 applicable.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding the inability to secure or hold a teacher, or because of the illness of the teacher pursuant to subdivision (a), from September 1, 2021, to June 30, 2022, inclusive, with the exception of a school closure for a schoolsite or class that only serves pupils who are individuals with exceptional needs, as defined in Section 56026, whose individualized education program developed pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 56340) of Chapter 4 of Part 30 of Division 4 does not specifically provide for participation in independent study or pupils who are enrolled in community day schools pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 48660) of Chapter 4 of Part 27 of Division 4, a school district, county office of education, or charter school shall not receive the same apportionment from the State School Fund pursuant to this section as it would have received had it not been so prevented from
 maintaining school for at least 180 full-length days for a school district or county office of education or 175 full-length days for a charter school if the school closure was due to impacts from COVID-19.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a school district, county office of education, or charter school may still receive credit for instructional days and minutes that were scheduled for in-person instruction, as demonstrated by the governing board or body approved calendar in place before the event, on days in which the school district, county office of education, or charter school was prevented from maintaining school due to the conditions indicated in paragraph (1) provided that instruction was offered to all eligible pupils through independent study pursuant to Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 51745) of Chapter 5 of Part 28 of Division 4 and implementing regulations adopted thereunder.

(B) The superintendent of a school district, the county superintendent of schools, or the administrator of a charter school shall certify to the Superintendent to offering all eligible pupils instruction through independent study pursuant subparagraph (A).

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), from September 1, 2021, to June 30, 2022, inclusive, a school district, county office of education, or charter school may receive the same apportionment from the State School Fund pursuant to this section for school closures related to impacts from COVID-19 due to COVID-19 related staffing shortages if the following conditions are established to the satisfaction of the Superintendent by affidavits of the members of the governing board or body of the school district, county office of education, or charter school and the county superintendent of schools:

(A) The school district, county office of education, or charter school is unable to provide in-person instruction to pupils due to staffing shortages as a result of staff quarantine due to exposure to, or infection with, COVID-19 pursuant to local or state public health guidance.

(B) For certificated staff shortages, the school district, county office of education, or charter school has exhausted all options for obtaining staff coverage, including using all certificated staff and substitute teacher options, and has consulted with their county office of education and the Superintendent in determining that staffing needs cannot be met through any option.

(C) For classified staff shortages, the school district, county office of education, or charter school has exhausted all options for obtaining staff coverage, including
 using all staff options, and has consulted with their county office of education and the Superintendent in determining that staffing needs cannot be met through any option.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 477, Sec. 1.   (SB 1429)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

41423.

No money shall be apportioned to a district for the excess cost of educating pupils in a 24-hour elementary school of the district unless such school has met the requirements of the Superintendent of Public Instruction based upon educational standards and standards established by state agencies authorized by law to inspect or supervise child-caring institutions.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41450.

The Legislature finds that each year one or more school districts or county offices of education experience severe financial difficulty. In some cases these school districts or county offices of education request emergency apportionments from the state under the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 41320). In order to reduce the need for these apportionments, it is the intent of the Legislature that the Superintendent of Public Instruction be authorized to provide assistance and guidance to school districts and county offices of education that are experiencing severe financial difficulty. That assistance and guidance shall be limited to the fiscal concerns addressed by the standards and criteria adopted pursuant to Section 33127.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1462, Sec. 1.15.)
-------------------------------------------

41455.

After receiving the advice of the Controller, the Superintendent of Public Instruction is authorized pursuant to Section 41450 to contract with consultants possessing financial and administrative expertise, including county offices of education, to examine the financial problems of county offices of education and school districts that are identified as being in severe financial difficulty. The examination shall result in a written report to the Superintendent of Public Instruction regarding financial problems identified and recommendations on ways to alleviate them, which report shall be presented at a public meeting of the governing board of each of the school districts and county offices of education.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1462, Sec. 1.16.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.1. Emergency Apportionment Repayment for West Contra Costa Unified School District [41470. - 41474.]



  ARTICLE 1. Repayment of Loan Obligations [41470. - 41474.]

41470.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the West Contra Costa Unified School District is authorized to lease, rent, sell, or otherwise utilize, excess school district real properties and facilities, the proceeds of which shall be used for the exclusive and sole purpose of repaying specified loans from the General Fund. Those properties may include the properties identified by prior resolution of the Richmond Unified School District. No real properties upon which state funds have been expended for acquisition or construction of new, or renovation of existing,
 structures for which an encumbrance to the state is currently in effect, may be used for this purpose. Any proposed utilization of school district properties or facilities shall be specified in a general district plan that is part of the financial recovery plan developed by the district pursuant to Section 41327.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 57, Sec. 4.   Effective June 30, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41471.

(a) The loan obligations to which this chapter applies are as follows:

(1) The loan of nine million five hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($9,525,000) made to the Richmond Unified School District from the General Fund as an emergency apportionment pursuant to Chapter 171 of the Statutes of 1990, less any principal payments made prior to enactment of this bill.

(2) The loan of nineteen million dollars ($19,000,000)
 to the Richmond Unified School District, made pursuant to the May 2, 1991, order of the Superior Court of Contra Costa County.

(3) Interest charges through January 31, 1993, at the rates established by the initial loan agreements or legislation, as reflected in the repayment schedule specified in paragraph (b) of Section 41472. Interest charges beginning February 1, 1993, apply at a rate equal to the daily investment rate of the Pooled Money Investment Account on January 1, 1993.

(b) The loans specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) are hereby consolidated into one outstanding debt in the amount of twenty-eight million five hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($28,525,000), less any principal payments made prior to enactment of this bill.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 57, Sec. 4.   Effective June 30, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41472.

(a) The school district may prepay its loan obligation without incurring any prepayment penalties.

(b) (1) The minimum payment on the consolidated debt shall be determined according to the following payment schedule:Due DatePayment
Amount 2/1/93$ 02/1/9402/1/955,570,4432/1/961,870,4432/1/971,870,4432/1/985,570,443—————(2) The debt remaining after the school district’s 1998 payment shall be repaid as a straight-line loan amortized over a 20-year term. This amount shall be repaid by the school district, plus interest calculated at a rate equal to the rate earned by the Pooled Money Investment Account on the date the act that adds this paragraph is chaptered, for a period not to exceed 20 years. 

(c) If payment is not made within 60 days after the scheduled date, the Controller shall pay the defaulted loan payment of principal and interest by withholding that
 amount from the next available payment that would otherwise be made to the county treasurer on behalf of the district pursuant to Section 14041 of the Education Code. However, subject to the approval of the Department of Finance, the amount withheld may be in monthly amounts as determined by an agreement between the West Contra Costa Unified School District and the Controller during the period beginning with the next available apportionment through the month preceding the next scheduled payment.

(d) The Director of the Department of Finance may, upon the request of the Superintendent of Public Instruction, amend the payment schedule set forth in subdivision (b) if the director concludes that the amendment is warranted and is in the best interests of both the state and the West Contra Costa Unified School District education program. Upon that determination, the director shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee that the payment
 schedule will be changed on the date that is 90 days from the date of notification if the Legislature is in session, unless the Joint Legislative Budget Committee takes appropriate action to preclude that change. If the 90-day period ends during a recess of the Legislature or while the Legislature is not in session, the 90-day period shall be extended until the Legislature reconvenes. Amendments to the repayment schedule shall defer the unpaid portion of a repayment of the earliest fiscal year in which no other repayment is scheduled. Interest shall accrue on the unpaid portion of a repayment from the scheduled due date until the time the payment is actually made. The interest charge shall be the same rate as specified in Section 41471.

(e) If the district is able to sell properties in advance of any of the obligations contained in the schedule set forth in subdivision (b), the scheduled interest cost shall be reduced in accordance with any
 prepayments that are made. If the repayment schedule is amended pursuant to subdivision (d), all proceeds from any properties sold in advance of any of the obligations shall be used as prepayment on the schedule.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 950, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

41473.

Any and all provisions of statute that impose a condition on the sale, use, or transfer of public agency lands and properties as they would apply to the actions of the West Contra Costa Unified School District, including, but not limited to, Sections 17732 and 39363, pertaining to the use of schoolsite sale proceeds, and Section 39363.5 and Section 54222 of the Government Code pertaining to priority offerings of public lands for public purposes, are hereby waived until the loans identified in this article are repaid. This waiver authority does not extend to any real
 properties upon which state funds have been expended for acquisition or construction of new, or renovation of existing, structures for which an encumbrance to the state is currently in effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 57, Sec. 4.   Effective June 30, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41474.

Notwithstanding Sections 41471 and 41472, the school district may submit a request to the Director of Finance to have the interest rate on the remaining outstanding balance of its emergency apportionments changed to reflect the investment rate of the Pooled Money Investment Account as reported by the State Controller’s office for the immediately preceding fiscal year. Upon receipt of the request, the Director of Finance shall change the interest rate pursuant to this section. A change in the interest rate does not change other terms of the repayment
 schedule.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 52, Sec. 11.   Effective June 21, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.2. Categorical Education Block Grant Funding [41480. - 41590.]



  ARTICLE 1. Educator Effectiveness Block Grant [41480. - 41480.]

41480.

(a) (1) The sum of one billion five hundred million dollars ($1,500,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Superintendent for the Educator Effectiveness Block Grant. The Superintendent shall apportion these funds to school districts, county offices of education, charter schools, and the state special schools in an equal amount per full-time equivalent certificated staff, which shall not exceed the total certificated staff count, and full-time equivalent classified staff count, for each eligible local educational agency, in the 2020–21 fiscal year. The Superintendent shall make the calculations pursuant to this section using the data submitted through the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System and classified staff data submitted through the California Basic Educational
 Data System as of October 2020.

(2) A school district, county office of education, charter school, or state special school may expend the funds received pursuant to this subdivision from the 2021–22 fiscal year to the 2025–26 fiscal year, inclusive. School districts, county offices of education, charter schools, and state special schools shall coordinate the use of any federal funds received under Title II of the federal Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015 (Public Law 114–95) to support teachers and administrators with the expenditure of funds received pursuant to this subdivision.

(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Educator Effectiveness Block Grant support increased educator access to standards-aligned professional support for high-need areas of instruction, including, but not limited
 to, English language instruction, inclusive special education, early childhood education, and science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) instruction, including, but not limited to, computer science.

(b) A school district, county office of education, charter school, or state special school shall expend funds apportioned pursuant to this section to provide professional learning for teachers, administrators, paraprofessionals who work with pupils, and classified staff that interact with pupils, with a focus on any of the following areas:

(1) Coaching and mentoring of staff serving in an instructional setting and beginning teacher or administrator induction, including, but not limited to, coaching and mentoring solutions that address a local need for teachers that can serve all pupil populations with a focus on retaining teachers, and offering
 structured feedback and coaching systems organized around social-emotional learning, including, but not limited to, promoting teacher self-awareness, self-management, social awareness, relationships, and responsible decisionmaking skills, improving teacher attitudes and beliefs about one’s self and others, and supporting learning communities for educators to engage in a meaningful classroom teaching experience.

(2) Programs that lead to effective, standards-aligned instruction and improve instruction in literacy across all subject areas, including English language arts, history-social science, science, technology, engineering, mathematics, computer science, and preschool learning foundations. This may include coursework that would allow existing staff to become credentialed, fully credentialed for their assignment, or meet the requirements of subdivision (g) of Section 48000.

(3) Practices and strategies that reengage pupils and lead to accelerated learning.

(4) Strategies to implement social-emotional learning, trauma-informed practices, suicide prevention, access to mental health services, and other approaches that improve pupil well-being.

(5) Practices to create a positive school climate, including, but not limited to, restorative justice, training around implicit bias, providing positive
 behavioral supports, multitiered systems of support, transforming a schoolsite’s culture to one that values diverse cultural and ethnic backgrounds, and preventing discrimination, harassment, bullying, and intimidation based on actual or perceived characteristics, including disability, gender, gender identity, gender expression, language, nationality, race or ethnicity, religion, or sexual orientation.

(6) Strategies to improve inclusive practices, including, but not limited to, universal design for learning, best practices for early identification, and development of individualized education programs for individuals with exceptional needs.

(7) Instruction and education to support implementing effective language acquisition programs for English learners, which may include integrated language development within and across content areas, and building and strengthening capacity to
 increase bilingual and biliterate proficiency.

(8) New professional learning networks for educators not already engaged in an education-related professional learning network to support the requirements of subdivision (c).

(9) Instruction, education, and strategies to incorporate ethnic studies curricula adopted pursuant to Section 51226.7 into pupil instruction for grades 7 to 12, inclusive.

(10) Instruction, education, and strategies for certificated and classified educators in early childhood education, or childhood development.

(11) (A) Strategies to improve beginning teacher retention and support through teacher induction programs, including
 mentor training, stipends for mentor teachers, beginning teacher induction program costs following initial preparation, the examination or assessment fee for one administration of the reading instruction competence assessment or a teaching performance assessment, training mentors to support candidates in completing a performance assessment or reading instruction competence assessment, or contracting with commission-approved preliminary teacher preparation programs to provide mentoring support for the completion of required assessments.

(B) Funding apportioned pursuant to this section that is used to improve beginning teacher retention and support through teacher induction programs consistent with subparagraph (A), shall supplement and not supplant funding already provided by grant recipients for similar purposes.

(c) To ensure professional development meets educator and pupil needs, local educational agencies are encouraged to allow schoolsite and content staff to identify the topic or topics of professional learning. Reasonably related costs of providing and attending professional learning, including, but not limited to, travel, per diem reimbursement, and substitute costs, are allowable expenditures of funds apportioned pursuant to this section. Professional learning provided pursuant to this section shall do both of the following:

(1) Be content focused, incorporate active learning, support collaboration, use models of effective practice, provide coaching and expert support, offer feedback and reflection, and be of sustained duration.

(2) As applicable, be aligned to the academic content standards adopted pursuant to Sections 51226, 60605, 60605.1, 60605.2, 60605.3, 60605.4, 60605.8, and 60605.11, and the model curriculum adopted pursuant to Section 51226.7, as those sections read on June 30, 2020, and former Section 60605.85, as that section read on June 30, 2014.

(d) As a condition of receiving funds apportioned pursuant to this section, a school district, county office of education, charter school, or state special school shall do all of the following:
